Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Investigations and Disciplinary Proceedings
§ 33-26-408.
Protected action and communication.

There shall be no liability on the part of and no action for damages against:

Board and examination committee members acting within the scope of their functions without malice and in the reasonable belief that their actions were warranted;

Any person providing information voluntarily or pursuant to a subpoena, in good faith to a peer review committee or in good faith to the board or the examining committee without malice and in reasonable belief that the information is accurate.

All board records shall be maintained and protected from harm.

Final findings of fact, conclusions of law, orders of the board entered and any consent decree, stipulation or agreement to which the board is a party in any disciplinary docket of the board are public documents. The board may order, under special circumstances and upon entry of specific findings setting forth those circumstances, that a consent decree, stipulation or agreement to which the board is a party in any disciplinary docket is not a public document.

The board shall promptly report and provide all final orders entered by it to the chief of the medical staff and hospital administrator of each hospital in which the licensee has medical staff privileges and to all appropriate agencies including the federation of state medical boards, the national practitioner data bank and other state medical boards.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the United States or the state of Wyoming from obtaining information from the board concerning a physician who is the subject of a criminal investigation. Upon petition to a state or federal district court, supported by affidavit, the judge may order the Wyoming board of medicine to release records of any proceedings, testimony of witnesses and reports or investigation for in-camera inspection by the judge, or the judge may deny the petition for failure to show good cause. The petition shall state the nature of the criminal investigation and the identity of the physician who is under investigation. If the judge grants the petition and orders the board to produce the board’s records for in-camera inspection, the board shall comply within ten (10) days after entry of the order or as otherwise ordered by the court. Upon receipt of the records, the judge shall inspect them to determine what material, if any, is relevant to the criminal investigation. Material deemed to be relevant shall be made available to the investigation if otherwise admissible under the Wyoming Rules of Evidence. All records and material deemed by the court to be irrelevant or otherwise inadmissible under the Wyoming Rules of Evidence shall be returned to the board and the contents thereof shall not be divulged.

The following documents are not public documents and are not subject to disclosure by the board to any person or entity nor are they subject to discovery in any civil or administrative action or admissible in any nonboard proceeding except when necessary for further board action, in any action in which the board may be named as a party or upon judicial review of a board order:

Investigative notes, attorney’s notes and work product and reports, pleadings, correspondence, witness statements and deposition transcripts and copies of original medical and prescription records in the possession of the board, whether acquired by the board, by any agent of the board or by any agency that has cooperated with or provided information to the board regarding the investigation of a disciplinary docket; and

Any and all records of the board regarding licensure applications and proceedings thereon.

A respondent in a disciplinary case shall not be entitled to copies of investigative material unless the material is relevant to an ongoing investigation or a contested case hearing.

The confidentiality of all documents and information described in this section shall exist and continue regardless of whether the confidential material is in the custody of any agency of the United States or any other agency of the state of Wyoming with whom the board has cooperated or is cooperating in an investigation.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit the board from publishing in a directory or otherwise disclosing, general information about its licensees and former licensees including names, practice addresses, dates of licensure, licensure by other states, areas of practice, education, training and specialty board certifications.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-340.13; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-139; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Evidence, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Right to examination results. —

Basic notions of fairness and due process prohibit requiring an accused, civil or criminal, to be evaluated or examined and then using the results in the prosecution without affording the accused the right to have the results to prepare a response. Painter v. Abels, 998 P.2d 931,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Devous v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Exmrs., 845 P.2d 408,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Right of voluntary disclosure of privileged proceedings of hospital medical review or doctor evaluation processes, 60 ALR4th 1273.

Tort liability of medical society or professional association for failure to discipline or investigate negligent or otherwise incompetent medical practitioner, 72 ALR4th 1148.

Existence, nature and application to medical professional disciplinary board of privilege against disclosure of identity of informer, 86 ALR4th 1024.

§ 33-26-409.
Health care entity reports required; malpractice.

Each health care entity shall report:

Any action it takes against a licensee on the grounds that the licensee is impaired, or has engaged in conduct constituting a ground for disciplinary action in W.S.

33-26-402

;

Any action that:

Adversely affects the clinical privileges of a licensee for a period exceeding thirty (30) days;

Accepts the surrender of a physician’s clinical privilege:

While the licensee is under investigation by the entity for possible incompetence or improper professional conduct; or

In return for not conducting an investigation as specified in this subparagraph; or

In the case of an entity which is a professional society, takes a professional review action which adversely affects the membership of a licensee in the society.

Each licensee shall report to the board any personal injury or wrongful death claim made because of any alleged act, error or omission of the licensee. Failure to report the claim shall be grounds for disciplinary action by the board. As used in this subsection, “claim” means a properly filed complaint with the district court which names the licensee as defendant or a third party defendant and alleges that damages sustained by the plaintiff are due to an alleged act, error or omission of the licensee while engaged in the practice of medicine.

Each insurer providing health care professional liability insurance in this state shall report to the board all claims for which a reserve has been established against a licensee. Reports required by this subsection shall be made within sixty (60) days of the time the claim comes to the attention of the insurer.

Other reports required by this section shall be made within ninety (90) days of the time the claim comes to the attention of the person responsible for reporting. Reports shall be in the form and contain information required by the board. Any entity or person subject to the reporting requirements of this section shall be subject to a fine up to one hundred dollars ($100.00) for each violation of this section. Each day that a requirement of this section is not met shall constitute a separate violation. In the event that the board is required to bring a civil action to enforce this section, the violating party shall additionally be liable to the board for all reasonable attorney’s fees and costs incurred by the board in prosecuting the action.

History.

Laws 1976, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 24, § 1; W.S. 1957, §§ 33-340.1, 33-340.4; W.S. 1977, §§ 33-26-127, 33-26-130; Laws 1981, ch. 78, § 1; 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 1991, ch. 143, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Cited

in

Guier v. Teton County Hosp. Dist., 2011 WY 31, — P.3d —,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Feb. 24, 2011).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Malpractice in diagnosis and treatment of male urinary tract and related organs, 48 ALR5th 575.

§ 33-26-410.
Effect of violation.

Any person engaged in the practice of medicine or aiding and abetting another in the practice of medicine without a license granted by the board is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one (1) year, or both. Each violation constitutes a separate offense for which the penalty in this subsection may be assessed.

Any person filing or attempting to file as his own the diploma of another or forged affidavit of identification is guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be imprisoned in the penitentiary for a term not exceeding three (3) years.

The attorney general, the board, any county or district attorney or any citizen may obtain an injunction in the name of the state of Wyoming upon the relation of a complainant enjoining any person from engaging in the practice of medicine without a license. The district court of the district in which the offending person resides or the district court of Laramie county has original jurisdiction of any such injunction proceedings. Any defendant who is enjoined and who thereafter violates the injunction shall be punished for contempt of court by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200.00) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than six (6) months or not more than one (1) year, or both. An injunction may be issued without proof of actual damage sustained and upon proof of one (1) or more acts constituting practice of medicine without a license. The standard of proof of any violation of this subsection shall be by a preponderance of the evidence.

History.

Laws 1899, ch. 18, § 14; R.S. 1899, § 2202; Laws 1905, ch. 45, § 14; C.S. 1910, § 2878; C.S. 1920, § 3526; Laws 1925, ch. 126, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 86-114; Laws 1933, ch. 24, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-2014; Laws 1957, ch. 142, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 33-342; W.S. 1977, § 33-26-141; Laws 1987, ch. 79, § 1; 2003, ch. 190, § 2.

Constitutionality. —

This section does not violate Wyo. Const., art. 3, § 26. State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

History of section. —

See State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1952).

Practice of naturopathy dependent upon admission to practice as physician or surgeon. —

The health and well-being of the members of society is too important to justify the failure to make requirements commensurate with the advancement of civilization. There is nothing to prohibit the practice of naturopathy provided that under our statute the practitioner has the learning of a physician and surgeon and has been admitted to practice as such in this state. Such a requirement is valid. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Practice of naturopathy cannot be regarded as separate and distinct profession. —

Our statute is clear, that the practice of naturopathy cannot be regarded as a separate and distinct profession, like that of dentistry for instance, nor is there any good reason why the legislature may not for the benefit of society require that those who practice the healing art should know and keep up with the improvements and advanced learning in that art. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Application in prosecution for manslaughter. —

Although the defendant was not prosecuted for practicing medicine without a license under this section nor for violating the former provisions relating to chiropody, the jury had the right to know and to take into consideration the fact that the defendant, charged with manslaughter, was not a licensed physician or surgeon, in determining whether or not the defendant was guilty of criminal negligence in administering an anesthetic to the deceased. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

If the defendant practiced medicine without a license, and death to his patient ensued as the proximate cause thereof, he would be guilty of manslaughter, at least if his treatment was with criminal negligence. State v. Catellier, 63 Wyo. 123, 179 P.2d 203,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1947).

Prohibited practices. —

Practicing medicine and receiving compensation therefor and practicing medicine without a license are separate offenses under this section. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).

Matter of sentence in discretion of trial court. —

Matter of sentence, in a prosecution under this section for practicing without a license, is addressed to the sound discretion of trial court. Hahn v. State, 78 Wyo. 258, 322 P.2d 896,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1958).